Hawaii statutes.
[§171-153] Beach restoration plan. The
department shall prepare and, from time to time, revise plans for the
restoration of beach lands of the State. These plans shall guide the board in
identifying those beach lands in need of restoration which have been degraded
as a result of natural or human actions and shall designate suitable coastal
lands for the purpose of generating revenues to carry out the purposes of this
section. In preparing these plans, the department may institute studies
pertaining to the need for restoration of such lands and shall consider any
plan relating to the restoration of such lands that has been prepared by any
federal, state, county, or private agency or entity. The department may also
institute other studies as necessary to support the development of beach
restoration projects, including the development of socioeconomic profiles,
environmental studies pertaining to sand source analysis, and ecological
effects of beach restoration, cost-benefit analysis for project viability, and
coastal engineering studies including data gathering. [L 1999, c 84, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next